Mississippi, session 2026, SB3114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  An honorably discharged member of the Armed Forces of the United States, upon presentation to the issuing official of a valid DD Form 214, may receive: (a)  One (1) license tag issued under Section 27-19-5, 27-19-35, 27-19-43, 27-19-51 or, for a private carrier of passengers in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds, 27-19-11 at no cost whatsoever; or (b)  One (1) license tag issued under any other provision of this chapter for a private carrier of passengers at only the cost of the additional fee for the special or personalized tag. (2)  Each person shall receive no more than one (1) tag under this section.  A household with more than one (1) honorably discharged member of the Armed Forces of the United States may receive more than one (1) tag under this section, if each member presents his or her own DD Form 214 to the issuing official. (3)  The department may promulgate rules and regulations to implement this section. SECTION 2.  Section 27-19-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-5.  Except as provided in Section 1 of this act, there is hereby levied the following annual highway privilege tax on operators of private carriers of passengers as reasonable compensation for the use of the highways of this state: (a)  On the owner or operator of each private carrier of passengers..................................................$15.00 (b)  On each motorcycle, per annum..................8.00 SECTION 3.  Section 27-19-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-11.  (1)  On each carrier of property, for each commercial motor vehicle, truck-tractor or road tractor, and on each bus, there is hereby levied an annual highway privilege tax in accordance with the following schedule, except that the gross vehicle weight of buses shall be the gross weight of the vehicle plus one hundred fifty (150) pounds per each regular seat. RATE OF TAX GROSS WEIGHT        COMMON AND PRIVATE         PRIVATE OF VEHICLE CONTRACT           COMMERCIAL CARRIERS NOT TO EXCEED       CARRIERS OF AND             OF IN POUNDS PROPERTY           NONCOMMERCIAL PROPERTY CARRIERS OF PROPERTY 0000 -  6000 $    7.20 $    7.20     $    7.20 6001 - 10000            33.60 25.20 16.80 10001 - 16000            78.40 70.70         39.20 16001 - 20000           156.00 129.00         78.00 20001 - 26000           228.00 192.00        114.00 26001 - 30000           300.00 247.00        150.00 30001 - 36000           384.00 318.00        192.00 36001 - 40000           456.00 378.00        228.00 40001 - 42000           504.00 420.00        264.00 42001 - 44000           528.00 444.00        276.00 44001 - 46000           552.00 456.00        282.00 46001 - 48000           588.00 492.00        300.00 48001 - 50000           612.00 507.00        312.00 50001 - 52000           660.00 540.00        336.00 52001 - 54000           684.00 564.00        348.00 54001 - 56000           708.00 588.00        360.00 56001 - 58000           756.00 624.00        384.00 58001 - 60000           780.00 642.00 396.00 60001 - 62000           828.00 828.00        420.00 62001 - 64000           852.00 852.00        432.00 64001 - 66000           900.00 900.00        482.00 66001 - 68000           936.00 936.00        504.00 68001 - 70000           972.00 972.00        516.00 70001 - 72000           996.00 996.00        528.00 72001 - 74000         1,128.00 1,128.00        576.00 74001 - 76000         1,248.00 1,248.00        612.00 76001 - 78000         1,380.00 1,380.00        720.00 78001 - 80000         1,512.00 1,512.00        864.00 80001 - 88000         1,776.00 1,776.00 1,152.00 The purchase of the license tag exceeding eighty thousand (80,000) gross vehicle weight is limited to the transport of products as provided for harvest permits as defined in Section 27-19-81(4).  Such license tag shall be a "HP" license tag with weight allowance printed on the cab card only. In addition to the above levied annual highway privilege tax on vehicles with a gross weight exceeding ten thousand (10,000) pounds, there is levied and shall be collected an additional privilege tax in the amount of One Thousand Eight Hundred Seventy-five Dollars ($1,875.00) for each current or later year model vehicle based upon a licensed weight of eighty-eight thousand (88,000) pounds.  This additional privilege tax shall be reduced by the amount of One Hundred Seventy-five Dollars ($175.00) for each year of age to a minimum of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) and further reduced by the ratio  of licensed weight to the maximum weight of eighty-eight thousand (88,000) pounds.  During the first year only, the privilege tax monies collected under the provisions of this paragraph shall be distributed to the various counties of the state on the basis of the ratio of the last year of annual ad valorem taxes collected by such counties on such vehicles to the total ad valorem taxes collected by all counties on such vehicles in the same year.  In all subsequent years, the distribution to the counties shall be made on the basis of the ratio of the number of motor vehicles registered in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds, in each taxing district in each county, to the total number of such vehicles registered statewide.  The counties shall then distribute these proceeds as they would if these collections were ad valorem taxes. From the privilege tax monies collected under this section, Three Million Seven Hundred Thirty-two Thousand Four Hundred Three Dollars and Eleven Cents ($3,732,403.11) shall be earmarked and set aside to be apportioned and paid to the counties of the state in the manner provided by Section 27-19-159, Mississippi Code of 1972.  Any excess privilege tax monies collected under this section shall be deposited into the State Highway Fund for the construction, maintenance and reconstruction of highways and roads of the State of Mississippi or the payment of interest and principal on bonds authorized by the 1972 Regular Session of the Legislature for construction and reconstruction of highways. No privilege license shall be issued for any period of time for less than One Dollar ($1.00).  Any person making an application for the license tag under this section is required to sign an affidavit attesting to facts indicating the applicability of this section.  Proof of purchase of a valid harvest permit for the vehicle must be presented at the time of purchase of the license tag. The annual highway privilege tax imposed on operators engaged exclusively in the transportation of household goods shall be the same as the tax imposed upon private commercial carriers by this section.  In determining the amount of privilege taxes due under the provisions of this section, there shall be allowed a maximum tolerance of five hundred (500) pounds on all classes of carriers except carriers of liquefied compressed gases and in the case of carriers of liquefied compressed gases there shall be allowed a maximum tolerance of two thousand (2,000) pounds. Any owner or operator who operates a motor vehicle on the public highways, with a license tag attached to it which was issued for another or different vehicle, shall be liable for the privilege tax on said vehicle for twelve (12) months plus a penalty thereon of twenty-five percent (25%). Carriers of property duly registered and licensed in another state and being used to transport farm harvesting machinery or equipment to and from a particular county in this state may, upon adoption of a resolution by the board of supervisors of the county where such machinery or equipment is being exclusively used in harvesting farm crops within the county, be exempt from the taxes herein levied when the resolution is filed with the Department of Revenue.  However, the exemption shall not exceed a period of forty (40) days for any annual period without a second resolution of approval by the board of supervisors who shall have the authority to extend the exemption not to exceed an additional period of twenty (20) days during any annual period. A private commercial carrier of property hauling interstate may purchase a common and contract carrier of property license plate at the prescribed fee to allow the carrier to lease on a one-way basis per trip without qualifying with the Public Service Commission. (2)  Beginning January 1, 2024, an owner of a carrier of property whose gross vehicle weight does not exceed ten thousand (10,000) pounds may choose a license tag with a black background and a white pinstripe border.  "Mississippi" shall be printed at the top, and the name of the county shall be printed at the bottom. The application and the additional fee of Thirty-eight Dollars and Twenty-five Cents ($38.25), less Two Dollars ($2.00) to be remitted to the Department of Revenue License Tag Acquisition Fund created in Section 27-19-179, shall be remitted to the department on a monthly basis as prescribed by the department. The remaining Thirty-six Dollars and Twenty-five Cents ($36.25) of the additional fee shall be deposited to the credit of the Law Enforcement Officers and Fire Fighters Death Benefits Trust Fund established in Section 45-2-1.  In all other respects, tags issued under this subsection (2) shall follow the guidelines for tags issued under subsection (1) of this section. (3)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the tax imposed in this section shall not apply to vehicles with license tags authorized to be obtained under Section 1 of this act. SECTION 4.  Section 27-19-43, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-19-43.  (1)  License tags, substitute tags and decals for individual fleets and for private carriers of passengers, school buses (excluding school buses owned by a school district in the state), church buses, taxicabs, ambulances, hearses, motorcycles and private carriers of property, and private commercial carriers of property of a gross weight of ten thousand (10,000) pounds and less, shall be sold and issued by the tax collectors of the several counties. (2)  Applications for license tags for motor vehicles in a corporate fleet registered under Section 27-19-66, trailers in a fleet registered under Section 27-19-66.1, motor vehicles in a rental fleet registered under Section 27-19-66.2, and applications for all other license tags, substitute tags and decals shall be filed with the department or the local tax collector of the respective counties and forwarded to the department for issuance to the applicant.  All tags and decals for vehicles owned by the state or any agency or instrumentality thereof, and vehicles owned by a fire protection district, school district or a county or municipality, and all vehicles owned by a road, drainage or levee district shall be issued by the department. (3)  In addition to the privilege taxes levied herein, there shall be collected the following registration or tag fee: (a)  For the issuance of both a license tag and two (2) decals, a fee of Five Dollars ($5.00). (b)  For the issuance of up to two (2) decals only, a fee of Three Dollars and Seventy-five Cents ($3.75). (c)  Additionally, the tax collector or the department, as the case may be, shall assess and collect a fee of Four Dollars ($4.00) upon each set of license tags and two (2) decals issued, or upon each set of two (2) decals issued, and that sum shall be deposited in the Mississippi Trauma Care Systems Fund established in Section 41-59-75, to be used for the purposes set out in that section. No tag or decal shall be issued either by a tax collector or by the department without the collection of such registration fee except substitute tags and decals and license tags for vehicles owned by the State of Mississippi. Beginning July 1, 1987, and until the date specified in Section 65-39-35, there shall be levied a registration fee of Five Dollars ($5.00) in addition to the regular registration fee imposed in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.  Such additional registration fee shall be levied in the same manner as the regular registration fee. (4)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, none of the fees imposed in this section shall apply to license tags authorized to be obtained under Section 1 of this act. SECTION 5.  Section 27-19-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-19-35.  (1)  The tag for motorcycles shall be in every respect similar to the ordinary vehicle tag, subject to regulations of the commission, with the exception that it shall be only six (6) inches wide, and three (3) inches high.  It shall have the number and abbreviation "MISS." and an appropriate area provided for year and month decals, as aforesaid, and shall be fastened immovably, in an upright position, at the rear of the cycle, so that it will be plainly visible and legible at all times from the rear of the cycle. (2)  Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, personalized license tags and special license tags may be issued for motorcycles as provided in Sections 27-19-48, 27-19-56 and 27-19-56.14. SECTION 6.  Section 27-19-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-19-51.  (1)  (a)  In recognition of their many and varied patriotic services rendered the state, the United States and the citizens thereof, Mississippians who have completed an active duty career with the Armed Forces of the United States and active duty and retired members of the Army National Guard, Air National Guard, and the United States Reserves, including both enlisted and officer personnel, upon application and subject to the provisions of this section may be issued distinctive motor vehicle license plates or tags identifying these persons with such organizations.  For the purposes of this section the term "Armed Forces" includes the United States Merchant Marines and members thereof in maritime service during the period from December 7, 1941 to August 15, 1945. The distinctive plates or tags so issued shall comply with the provisions of Section 27-19-41 and shall be of such color and design as may be agreed upon by the Adjutant General and the Department of Revenue for the Army National Guard or Air National Guard, by the Mississippi chapters of the Retired Officers Association and the Retired Non-Commissioned Officers Association and the Department of Revenue for retired active duty members of the Armed Forces of the United States, and by the Department of Revenue for retired members of the United States Merchant Marines.  Each distinctive license plate shall bear the words "National Guard" or the name of the appropriate armed service and need not bear prefixed numbers identifying the county of issuance. (b)  In recognition of their many and varied patriotic services rendered the state, the United States and the citizens thereof, Mississippians who are active duty and retired members of the Army National Guard and/or the Air National Guard, including both enlisted and officer personnel, upon application and subject to the provisions of this section may be issued distinctive motorcycle license plates or tags identifying these persons with such organizations.  The distinctive plates or tags so issued shall comply with the provisions of Section 27-19-41 and shall be of such color and design as may be agreed upon by the Adjutant General and the Department of Revenue.  Each distinctive license plate shall bear the words "National Guard" and need not bear prefixed numbers identifying the county of issuance. (2)  The surviving spouse of any person who was issued a distinctive license plate or tag under subsection (1) of this section because of completion of an active duty career with the Armed Forces of the United States or because of retirement from the Army National Guard, Air National Guard or United States Reserves, or any prisoner of war issued a distinctive license plate or tag under Section 27-19-54, shall be eligible to receive the same type of distinctive license plate or tag which the deceased spouse was issued. (3)  The distinctive license plates here provided for shall be prepared by the Department of Revenue and shall be issued through the tax collectors of the several counties of the state in like manner as are other motor vehicle license plates or tags and motorcycle license plates or tags and such officers shall be entitled to their regular fees for such service.  Applicants for such distinctive plates shall present to the issuing official proof of their membership in the Army National Guard, Air National Guard, or United States Reserves by means of certificate signed by the commanding officer of such applicant on forms prescribed by the Adjutant General of Mississippi.  Retired members of the Armed Forces of the United States applying for such plates shall present to the issuing officials a copy of their active duty retirement orders or other proof of retirement from active service with one of the Armed Forces of the United States.  The distinctive license plates or tags so issued shall be used only upon and for personally or jointly owned private passenger vehicles (to include station wagons, recreational motor vehicles and pickup trucks) and/or motorcycles registered in the name, or jointly in the name, of the member making application therefor, and when so issued to such applicant shall be used upon the vehicle or motorcycle for which issued in lieu of the standard license plate or license tag normally issued for such vehicle or motorcycle. (4)  In addition to use of such distinctive license plates or tags on such personally or jointly owned vehicles, such distinctive plate or tag may be used on state-owned vehicles operated by the State Military Department provided the prefix "MNG" is placed ahead of the number thereon.  Motor vehicles for which such distinctive license plates or tags are issued shall be registered by the proper official as are other motor vehicles. (5)  The distinctive license plates issued hereunder shall not be transferable between motor vehicle or motorcycle owners; and in the event the owner of a vehicle or motorcycle bearing such distinctive plate shall sell, trade, exchange or otherwise dispose of the vehicle or motorcycle, such plate shall be retained by the owner to whom issued and returned by the owner to the tax collector of the county or the Department of Revenue, as the case may be. (6)  The Adjutant General is authorized to recognize not more than one hundred (100) senior staff officers, commanders, command sergeants major and senior enlisted advisors by designating the issue of National Guard distinctive license plates or tags numbered "1" through "100."  These license plates or tags shall be retained by the individual so designated and may be transferred between vehicles or individuals under procedures established by the Department of Revenue.  The Adjutant General is responsible for furnishing the Department of Revenue necessary information to effect issue or transfer of these specially numbered license plates or tags. (7)  National Guard plates or tags shall be prepared and furnished for the licensing year commencing November 1, 1962, and annually thereafter.  The Adjutant General shall furnish the Department of Revenue with an estimate of the number of such distinctive plates or tags required in each of the several counties of the state. (8)  The provisions of this section are supplementary to the laws of this state pertaining to the licensing of motor vehicles and nothing herein shall be construed as abridging or repealing any of such laws. SECTION 7.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified in Chapter 19, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 8.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.